Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.125

Newly incorporated city or town—Liability for costs of elections.

A newly incorporated city or town shall be liable for its proportionate share of the costs of all elections, after the election on whether the area should be incorporated, at which an issue relating to the city or town is placed before the voters, as if the city or town was in existence after the election at which voters authorized the area to incorporate.

[ 1991 c 360 s 2.]